Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that nuclear energy is a safe and reliable source of nonemitting energy and that all electricity provided to Washington retail electric customers must be from nonemitting or renewable resources by January 1, 2045. The legislature finds that decarbonization policies and artificial intelligence applications have accelerated demand on Washington's electricity grid. Nuclear energy: (1) Provides significant value to a decarbonized grid; (2) is a clean, firm complement to renewable resources; (3) has low land-use requirements while producing energy at scale; and (4) offers high-paying jobs and regional economic benefits.Therefore, the legislature intends to study the benefits of expanded nuclear energy to Washington's clean energy economy.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall enter into a contract with a third party to conduct a study on the benefits of nuclear energy and the deployment of small modular reactors. The study must be referred to as the "commercial liftoff for energy from advanced nuclear" study. The study must include recommendations on how to maximize the benefits of nuclear energy and small modular reactors in the state, including the benefits of workforce development and job creation. The study must also include an examination of the feasibility and benefits of replacing a coal-fired electric generation facility as described in RCW 80.80.040(3)(c) with a nuclear power plant.(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the results of the study by July 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. The joint committee on energy supply, energy conservation, and energy resilience must convene to review the report produced by the joint legislative audit and review committee under section 2 of this act before December 1, 2027. The joint committee on energy supply, energy conservation, and energy resilience must offer an opportunity for public comment at this meeting.--- END ---